Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-273
County agricultural society; reinstatement; effect.

A county agricultural society renewing, extending, and continuing its corporate existence shall, upon complying with sections 2-267 to 2-272, be a corporation and continue its existence for the time stated in its certificate of renewal and shall, in addition to the rights, privileges, and immunities conferred by its original articles of incorporation, possess and enjoy all of the benefits of the laws of this state which are applicable to the nature of its business and shall be subject to the restrictions and liabilities imposed on such societies by the laws of this state.

Laws 1995, LB 671, § 9;

R.S.Supp.,1996, § 2-249;

Laws 1997, LB 469, § 24.